Chapter 2               II

At Inariyama in Fushimi, Kyoto, stood the renowned Inari Shrine, long celebrated as the god of prosperous business. Besides the main hall at the foot of the mountain, numerous subsidiary shrines and sacred mounds dotted the mountainside. Even in 1907 (Meiji 40), the local *o-tsuka* faith remained strong—people continued to revere the deities and spirits dwelling in these shrines and mounds as their household gods.

Along the winding pilgrimage path threading through the sacred mounds stood countless vermilion *torii* gates. Hundred Rivers Inako ascended the steep, mountain-like trail, enduring the fierce heat of August. She wore a dark blue *kasuri* kimono tied with a mustard-yellow obi, adorned with an obidome shaped like a mouse and a rice bag. Her braid, tied up in a single knot at the back, bounced with each step. Through the mountain air filled with cicadas’ cries, rustling leaves, and the distant sound of norito prayers recited at shrines and mounds, the sharp *karakoro* clatter of Inako’s *kiri* wooden clogs echoed.

From Yotsutsuji midway up the slope, she climbed a long flight of stairs, passed through a cluster of sacred mounds, and emerged from the scrub forest into a more open area. From there, she could see the Kyoto Electric Railway crossing the Kamo River on Kanshin Bridge, the barracks of the 38th Infantry Regiment in Fukakusa, and the Seven Roads train station below.

2.

This well-situated vantage point held a sacred mound dedicated to Akubi Ōmyōjin, a deity worshipped here. Part of the mountainside around it was bare rock, exposed and rugged, and pressed right against this cliff face stood a donation box and a modest pedestal—hardly more than an afterthought. Upon the pedestal were numerous offerings: small and large *torii* gates, votive items, and other devotional gifts.

Facing the sacred mound, Inako dropped her offering into the box, bowed twice, clapped twice, then drew in a deep breath.

"Please… this time, let me do it smoothly.  
Let me not be clumsy again. Let Father not get angry with me this time. May the string of my shamisen never snap during practice. May I become as beautiful as Onee-chan soon. And also—"

After thoroughly bowing until she felt satisfied, Inako began chanting the *Ōharae no Kotoba*, the Great Purification Ritual.

"Takamano-hara, where the divine spirits dwell, Emperor-ancestral deities Kumuromi and Kumurogi no Mikoto, by whose grace—"

The scent of candles drifted through the air. Her voice blended into the buzzing cicadas and rustling leaves, merging seamlessly with nature until she could truly feel it: this was a place where the gods resided, far removed from the ordinary clamor of daily life. A quiet warmth spread through her heart.

Then, as if harmonizing with her voice, the sound of *kagura* music began to drift from somewhere nearby.

While continuing her norito, Inako tried to locate the source of the music—was there a *kagura* hall close by? Yet strangely, the melody seemed unmistakably to come from the thick foliage atop the rocky cliff.

2.

Inako looked up just as the sound stopped, and an awkward “Ah!” escaped her lips.

The bushes atop the rocky cliff swayed violently—then suddenly, a boy tumbled down in a rush, sliding headlong.

The falling boy cried out, and after dramatically kicking over a donated *torii* gate with his backside, landed flat on his rear. Clutched to his chest was some box-shaped machine.

Inako stood frozen, stunned by the sudden turn of events—until she abruptly clapped a hand over her mouth in realization.

“He’s finally descended…! The deity has truly come!”

Joy surged hotly within her, and clasping her hands together, Inako began frantically bowing before the boy.

“Akubi Ōmyōjin-sama, Akubi Ōmyōjin-sama, please, I beg you to grant my wish—”

“Ya dumbass.”

The boy cheerfully whacked Inako on the head with a horn-like part he’d detached from the machine.

“Ow! What was that for?”

“That’s *my* line. Who just bows to a human who fell off a cliff without even checking if they’re hurt?”

Regaining her composure, Inako stared intently at the boy. He wore a cotton *kasuri* shirt layered under a *kogura* hakama—utterly ordinary attire for a mere youth. Realizing this, she quickly lowered her head in apology.

“Forgive me, please! I honestly thought my devotion had been answered and the god himself had appeared!”

“How in the world do you even come up with something like that?”

The boy sighed, reattaching the horn to his device. Inako watched him with rapt curiosity.

“First time seeing a phonograph?” the boy asked.

2.

The boy placed the phonograph on the base of the shrine and grasped the side handle to wind the spring. Once wound, the cylinder mounted horizontally at the center began spinning rapidly. The moment he touched a slender needle attached to the bell—later, she would learn this part was called a “horn”—to the cylinder, *kagura* music burst from the horn.

“That’s the *kagura* you just heard. Amazing, isn’t it? But how does sound come out all by itself?”

When the boy stopped the phonograph, he pulled out a tube shaped like a rolled-up fish cake and gently placed it into Inako’s palm.

“This is called a *roukan*—a wax cylinder. See the fine grooves carved into its surface? A needle traces these grooves, and the vibrations reproduce the recorded sound. Since this one has singing on it, it costs just over one yen.”

Startled by the price, Inako nearly dropped the cylinder. The boy barely caught it before it hit the ground, his face twisting in genuine frustration. “You idiot! I told you not to drop it!”

“S-Sorry… but that price is shocking! You could ride the Kyoto Electric Railway a hundred times for that!”

“It’s still cheaper than flat discs. And wax cylinders have some interesting features too.”

The boy took another *roukan* from his pocket and attached it to the phonograph, but this time, no sound came out.

“No sound? Is it broken?” Inako tilted her head.

The boy simply repositioned the needle to the beginning.

*“No sound? Is it broken?”*

Hearing her own voice echo from the phonograph, Inako flinched in shock. The boy grinned, clearly pleased with himself.

“This is what makes wax cylinder phonographs so great—anyone can easily record sound like this.”

2.

"There’s some amazing machinery indeed. But why on earth are you carrying something like this around?"

"I was entrusted to repair the phonograph at a local parishioner’s house nearby, and I was just testing it on the sacred mound before delivering it. Then I accidentally slipped and dropped it."

"Oh, so that’s what happened earlier—"

Just as the mood began to soften, Inako finally noticed the desecrated state of the sacred mound—the *torii* and offerings scattered in disarray—and cried out in outrage: "How could someone do such a blasphemous thing!"

The boy visibly grimaced at her anger, repulsed. He placed the lid with a handle onto the phonograph and hung it from his hand, then shot Inako a look of clear disdain.

"Sorry, but I don’t believe in things I can’t see."

As the boy turned to leave, Inako swiftly grabbed his obi. She pointed at the debris strewn across the ground.

"If you made the mess, you ought to clean it up—regardless of faith or superstition."

Gritting his teeth, the boy reluctantly restored the *torii* and other items to their proper places. Then he faced the sacred mound and clasped his hands together.

Inako started to think, *At least he knows to pay respects properly*—until she caught the look in his eyes, and her breath caught in her throat.

Even as he stood with hands joined, the boy glared at the sacred mound with pure hatred.

It was a terrifying gaze, like one reserved for a mortal enemy. Without bowing, he turned sharply on his heel and walked away as if nothing had happened, muttering, “Well then, that’s that.”

Snapping back to reality, Inako realized she needed to apologize to the sacred mound for the boy’s disrespect. Flustered, she hastily resumed chanting the *norito*.

2.

“At least he knows to pay respects properly”—until she caught the look in his eyes, and her breath caught in her throat. Even as he stood with hands joined, the boy glared at the sacred mound with pure hatred. It was a terrifying gaze, like one reserved for a mortal enemy. Without bowing, he turned sharply on his heel and walked away as if nothing had happened, muttering, “Well then, that’s that.” Snapping back to reality, Inako realized she needed to apologize to the sacred mound for the boy’s disrespect. Flustered, she hastily resumed chanting the *norito*.

“Great Yamato, land of the high sunrise—”

Perhaps because the boy’s fierce glare was burned into her mind, the words of the *norito*, which she had perfectly memorized, suddenly vanished. As she struggled to recall them—

“Having established this land as a peaceful realm—”

a voice rang out nearby. It was the boy, reciting the next line. He cast a single, scornful glance at a stunned Inako, then walked away without another word.

—What nerve, that boy!

Having finished her visit to Akubi Ōmyōjin, Inako descended the approach path with puffed cheeks.

Not only had her sacred mound been desecrated, but now she’d been “helped” by a faithless human. There could be no greater humiliation.

Still fuming, she passed through the forest and reached the foot of the mountain, where wooden fences lined the road. Leaning against one was a beggar. From his white garments, a single leg was visible.

Inako stopped before him. “Forgive me, but… your left leg—?”

“Lost it in the Russo-Japanese War.”

As Inako had suspected, the beggar was one of the *haibei*—a war-wounded veteran of the Russo-Japanese War.

“Were you with the Fourth Division, then?”

“Yes. During the general assault on Hill 203 three years ago, an enemy shell exploded nearby…”

Whether the memory of battle had resurfaced, his lips trembled, and by the end his voice was nearly a whisper. Seeing this, Inako immediately reached into her purse and pulled out her meager coin.

“I… this is little, but…”

“…Much obliged. Sorry to trouble you.”

2.

Before him, the beggar reached for Inako’s single sen coin—but suddenly let out a shrill cry: “Kiee!”

Startled, Inako gasped in shock. The beggar writhed violently, and with a *thud*, his supposedly missing left leg emerged from inside the fence. A centipede coiled around his ankle. Ignoring Inako, who stood frozen in horror, the man sprinted wildly down the approach path.

Inako turned to the wall where the beggar had stood. At low height, there was a hole just large enough for a foot.

“So he stuck his leg through here… pretending to be one-legged?”

“Exactly, you stupid fool.”

As she peered into the hole, suddenly a face appeared from the other side—making Inako shriek and fall flat on her backside. The boy from earlier grinned at her through the gap, then leapt over the fence with effortless grace.

“The Fourth Division never went to Hill 203. You were about to be perfectly duped.”

“You’re that boy from before—”

“I saw you on my way back from delivering the phonograph, listening intently to that suspicious-looking man. Just then, a centipede happened to be crawling on the ground, so I used it to set a little trap.”

She shuddered, recalling the centipede. Ever since being bitten as a child, she’d hated them.

“But anyway,” the boy continued, “I’ll take generous payment for this extermination job.”

Seeing the sly twist of his lips, Inako looked down at the single sen in her hand—and without hesitation, thrust it toward him.

“It’s all I have.”

Taken aback by her response, the boy faltered. “Don’t take me seriously—I was joking.”

“This is my thanks. You saved me from being deceived.”

---

2.

"One sen is already too much."

"Then consider it an offering to the gods. I was helped by a mischievous deity."

Eventually, the boy gave in and reluctantly took the coin. "Thanks... uh..."

"Huh? What's wrong?"

"Me? I'm Hundred Rivers Inako."

"...Grasshopper?"

"It's *Inako*!" She kicked his shin.

"Ow—what the hell! That’s rude!"

"After all that talk about being bitten by centipedes, who’s the rude one here? Now what’s your name?"

The boy, eyes welling with tears at the kick, still managed to keep his smug grin.  
"Sakamoto. Kihachi."

Since we were heading the same way, I ended up walking down the approach of the shrine together with the boy who called himself Kihachi.

He was slightly taller than Inako, about the same age—fifteen. He’d been born at a temple in Ōtsu, and while helping out at a relative’s shop, he attended a middle school in Kyoto. Right now, he was on summer break.

The conversation turned back to the earlier wax cylinder phonograph. When Inako tilted her head and asked, “Who’s this ‘Edison’ you mentioned?” Kihachi looked utterly shocked.

"You don’t know Edison? He’s the god of invention!"

"Eh? A god? What kind of blessings does he give? And where’s he enshrined?"

"Don’t go killing him off—he’s alive and well in America!"

"Well then," Inako said, and facing what she assumed was the direction of America, she clasped her hands together in prayer.

"Maybe if I pay my respects, I’ll receive some small blessing too."

2.

He was currently on summer break. The conversation circled back to the wax cylinder phonograph they’d been discussing earlier. When Inako tilted her head and asked, “Who’s this ‘Edison’ you mentioned?” Kihachi looked utterly shocked.  
“You don’t know Edison? He’s the god of invention!”  
“Eh? A god? What kind of blessings does he give? And where’s he enshrined?”  
“Don’t go deifying him—he’s alive and well in America!”  
“Well then,” said Inako, and facing what she assumed was the direction of America, she clasped her hands together in prayer. “Maybe if I pay my respects, I’ll receive some small blessing too.”

“If that’s the case,” Kihachi said, “why not visit Hieizan Yamashina Hachimangū? Apparently, Edison once used bamboo from around there as filament material for his incandescent light bulbs—and it led to great success.”  

“I don’t know anything about ‘filament’ or whatever, but it sounds like there’d be real benefits. I should pay a visit next time.”  
“You’ll pray, ‘Please let things go smoothly,’ then?” Kihachi asked with a wry smile.  
Inako flushed, realizing her earlier prayer had been overheard.  
“…If I have another disaster like today’s, maybe that’s exactly what I’ll ask for.”

Inako was the second daughter of Hyakugawa Shuzō, a sake brewery in Fushimi.  
Her father, Jin’emon, was a man who embodied the spirit of the old samurai. From childhood, Inako had been rigorously trained in etiquette and various traditional arts. While her elder sister mastered each discipline effortlessly, Inako—naturally clumsy in all things—repeatedly made blunders, each one drawing Jin’emon’s thunderous wrath.

The worst incident had occurred just that morning.

A prestigious guest was due to arrive that evening, so the entire family was cleaning. Inako had been diligently using a *hae toriki*—a fly trap consisting of a small metal basin filled with pungent lamp oil meant to lure and drown flies—when she suddenly remembered another errand. She left the device unattended in the hallway and walked away.

Moments later, a loud crashing sound echoed down the corridor. Alarmed, she rushed back—only to find Jin’emon waiting there, a grotesque sight: the overturned basin perched atop his head, oil dripping from his face along with trapped flies, his expression that of a vengeful demon.

2.

After being yelled at mercilessly, I was kicked out with the excuse that I’d only made more work for everyone by trying to clean.”

Sakamoto Kihachi was laughing so hard beside me he was nearly choking, but frustratingly, I couldn’t offer any defense.

The two of us descended the mountain and arrived at the back approach to the shrine. Along the path, souvenir shops displayed rows of the local specialty—Fushimi dolls—while teahouses lined up offering ice water and amazake.

Kihachi, perhaps feeling a bit peckish, took out a biscuit wrapped in paper and began nibbling at it daintily with his front teeth. He offered me one, but I politely declined—it looked cheap and low-quality just from a glance.

“Is it because your family enshrines Akubi Ōmyōjin at home that you visit that sacred mound, Inako?”

“No, that’s not it. Our family’s sacred mound is Goshendani. We visit Akubi Ōmyōjin’s mound because… if your faith is recognized, Akubi Ōmyōjin sends you a letter.”

Kihachi’s face twisted as he chewed, and he subtly edged a little farther away from Inako.

“I see… Yeah… I guess stranger things do happen.”

His eyes held a clear trace of pity. It was the unmistakable look of someone who thinks a woman has lost her mind.

“It’s true, really. When I was a child, my sister actually received a letter from Akubi Ōmyōjin.”

“I’ve heard of distant believers sending prayers by letter, but never of anyone actually receiving one from a god.”

Inako pouted, truly indignant that her words were being doubted.

2.

“Ōmyōjin sends you a letter.” Kihachi’s face twisted as he chewed, and he subtly edged a little farther away from Inako. “I see… Yeah… I guess stranger things do happen.” His eyes held a clear trace of pity. It was the unmistakable look of someone who thinks a woman has lost her mind. “It’s true, really. When I was a child, my sister actually received a letter from Akubi Ōmyōjin.”  
“I’ve heard of distant believers sending prayers by letter, but never of anyone actually receiving one from a god.”  
Inako pouted, truly indignant that her words were being doubted.  

“Anyway, that’s why I visit Akubi-san’s sacred mound. Besides that, I go to vent—I’m slow-witted, don’t have many friends, so I just talk to the gods. The offering money? That’s my consultation fee.”

“You actually believe a god listens to your complaints?”

“Believing is all I’ve got—that’s my one strength.”

She said it with utter confidence. Kihachi merely flicked biscuit crumbs from his fingers and muttered, “Huh.”

“Sakamoto-san, why were *you* at Akubi-san’s sacred mound?”

“Our household enshrines Akubi Ōmyōjin. My grandmother received the deity through training long ago.”

It’s said that those who train under a certain person named Odai at an Inari shrine can be granted the power of the sacred mound’s deity. Though Kihachi’s family belongs to a temple household, a special *hokora* containing the divided spirit (bunrei) of Akubi Ōmyōjin—granted to his grandmother—is enshrined in their kamidana. He’d been taught again and again, “The god will escape if you open it—never open this shrine.” As children, Kihachi and his older brother had called it “the forbidden shrine.”

Just as Inako began to admire him for dutifully making offerings, Kihachi laughed and denied it.

“The view’s great up there. I often sit on that spot and eat my lunch.”

At such irreverent words, Inako thought once again: *Yeah, I really hate this guy.*

When they reached the Kyoto Electric Railway stop, a single tramcar stood waiting—its appearance like a white-and-brown *uhiro* sweet. This tram, which chimed *chin, chin* as it ran, was affectionately known among people as the Keiden.

2.

A few years ago, a boy known as the *saki-bari*—a runner who dashed ahead of the tram—would race in front of the train, shouting, “Here comes the tram! Watch out, danger’s coming!” But due to the risks and heavy labor involved, the practice had been discontinued a few years prior, replaced instead by safety nets mounted on both ends of the tramcar to prevent accidents.

“Yeah. Since I’ve got it, might as well pass it along.”

Kihachi paused as he was about to board, then handed over an amuletic slip. It bore the Seven Lucky Gods and the shop name “Hōrai Butsugu-ten,” along with the phrase *“Mechanical Repairs Undertaken,”* an address—and unusually—also a telephone number.

“If any of your machines break, come to us. First time, we’ll settle it with a nice biscuit.”

Inako frowned, puzzled. A Buddhist goods shop offering mechanical repairs? What on earth was this? But just then, the bell chimed—*chin, chin*.

“If you’ve got complaints, bring a penny. I’ll listen in place of that god whose existence nobody’s sure of.”

With that flippant remark, Kihachi leapt onto the departing tram and rode away.

“Saying such disrespectful things again…”

Fuming, Inako looked down at the slip—and noticed writing on the back.

“‘Electrical Catalogue’…?”

Alongside that line, the reverse side was covered in hasty scribbles: terms like *Yoru Shirazu*, *Denpō*, and explanatory notes, even something resembling a rough diagram. Some parts were crossed out with diagonal lines, as if it were a personal memo. She wondered if she should have even accepted this, but with no way to return it, Inako reluctantly tucked the slip away, though it nagged at her mind.

---

2.

Leaving Inari Shrine and heading south through Fujinomori toward the Sumizome area, Inako arrived at the entrance of a small pleasure district.

Though far smaller than Gion or Shimabara, it was an old hanamachi where tales lingered of Ōkimi no Kurano-suke from *Chūshingura* having once frequented its teahouses. It should have been quiet during the day, yet today a lively chorus rang out:

“Kowa harakara o / Horobi yori / Sukawan tame no / Ikusa nari—”

“They’ve got the Salvation Army here.”

A group clad in navy-blue military caps and uniforms embroidered with “Salvation Army” marched down the street lined with brothels, playing trumpets and drums in time with the hymn *Kowa Harakara o*. 

Although human trafficking had been banned since the Prostitute Emancipation Edict of Meiji 5 (1872), countless women still ended up in the pleasure quarters due to poverty and unemployment. The Salvation Army, a Protestant Christian sect, stood at the forefront of the movement to abolish prostitution.

Despite its martial name, their work remained strictly peaceful. Right now, they were engaged in what they called *no*, *sen*, or field evangelism—distributing tracts and pamphlets like bullets to passersby.

Suddenly spotting a figure she thought she recognized at the front of the procession, Inako started forward—only for a bald man with a booming voice to bellow, “What d’you think you’re doin’, huh?!” as he stepped squarely into the path of the marchers. Startled, Inako ducked behind a stack of wooden barrels under a shop’s eaves.

“You scum! How dare you interfere with folks’ livelihoods, eh?”

---

2.

“We’ve come to save women who are suffering unjust treatment!”

The man at the front was noticeably larger and sturdier than the others—so much so that he almost looked Western.

“You are sinners just as we are. Unless you repent, you can never become true human beings. Wake up—quickly!”

“We’ve been wide awake for ages. You lot keep spouting nonsense, over and over.”

“The law permits prostitutes to freely abandon their profession, and forbids any interference. Come with us, and we’ll give you training to reintegrate into society.”

A window on the second floor of a brothel flew open, and a tobacco tray came hurtling down, striking the Salvation Army man directly on the head. His military cap tumbled off, revealing his closely cropped hair—but showing no sign of pain, he shot a sharp glare upward toward the window.

“It’s him… it’s definitely Kumi-san.”

That towering figure was Kumi Ken’go, someone Inako knew well. As Kumi brushed ash from his uniform, laughter erupted behind him, and one after another, men poured out from inside the brothel, quickly surrounding the Salvation Army group.

“Get ‘em!” the men shouted, lunging at the Salvation Army. Chaos erupted in the pleasure district.

Amid swirling dust, several men pummeled the missionaries, who offered no real resistance, only repeating with stubborn resolve: “Hear our words! Hear our message!”

As Inako worried for Kumi’s safety, the bald-headed man turned sharply toward her, fixing her with a piercing stare. She froze like a frog caught in a snake’s gaze.

In an instant, the bald man strode over. “Are you one of their accomplices?” he snarled, roughly seizing her wrist. Inako let out a small cry—and the moment she did, Kumi ceased his preaching, recognizing her at once.

2.

Kumi stood dumbfounded for a moment—but the instant he grasped the situation, his expression darkened sharply. As Kumi turned toward her, two men lunged at him simultaneously from both sides.

Kumi transformed into the wrathful visage of Fudō Myō-ō. With effortless ease, he seized their arms and flung them aside as if they were weightless.

The men staggered back in shock as their comrades soared over Kumi’s head. Charging forward like a storm, Kumi scattered the surrounding attackers with a single thrust, then rushed to Inako’s side. With one hand, he grabbed the bald-headed man by the collar and hoisted him into the air.

To Inako, who had collapsed onto the ground, Kumi spoke in an unexpectedly gentle voice:

“I didn’t expect you to be here. Stay right where you are.”

The bald man, hurled away by Kumi, plunged headfirst into a stack of wooden barrels, collapsing under the wreckage as they toppled.

Once more surging into motion, Kumi seized each assailant by the nape of the neck and hurled them one after another. Those who clung to his body were dragged like runaway locomotives as he charged wildly across the district, unstoppable in every direction.

“No wonder they call him ‘Roku-Jōki’—just like steam-powered force incarnate.”

During the Russo-Japanese War, Kumi had earned distinction in fierce battles at Nanzan, Fengtian, and elsewhere. His relentless, fearless charges—even against enemy Maxim machine guns—had drawn comparison to a locomotive, earning him the nickname “Roku-Jōki,” derived from the “Roku” in his name.

Now, no one in the pleasure quarter dared stand against Kumi. The attackers scattered like spiders’ young fleeing in all directions, vanishing into brothels. At last, calm returned. Kumi exchanged a few brief words with his companions, and the Salvation Army, now reformed into orderly ranks, departed the hanamachi—leaving only Kumi behind.

“Inako, are you hurt?”

2.

Watching the Salvation Army march away, Kumi approached, readjusting his military cap and brushing dust from his soiled uniform. The fury on his face had completely faded, replaced by his usual stern expression.

“Thanks to you… I’m truly grateful for your help.”

“As long as you’re safe, that’s what matters most. But we shouldn’t stand around talking here—let’s get going.”

Prompted by Kumi, the two left the hanamachi. Heading south, they soon reached the bridge spanning Sumizome Incline, where a single boat mounted on a cart was being hauled upward by steel cables beneath their feet.

“You got hit in the head with a tobacco tray earlier—were you alright?”

“That didn’t bother me, but what came after—that’s another matter. Forcing people into submission by brute strength… that’s not the proper way of spreading our faith.”

“But still, thanks to you, I was saved.”

“Was I? Acting without thinking—I always rush in headfirst. It’s my worst habit.”

“Oh, then—if you don’t mind—please come by my house. I’d like to thank you properly.”

At Inako’s invitation, Kumi made a grimace. “No, that won’t be necessary.”

“Your sister should be home too, I imagine.”

“She’s *exactly* why it would be a problem,” he muttered.

Inako frowned slightly, her brows drawing together. “Don’t be shy. Come on—we’ll have some good tea together.”

After the faintest twitch of his eyebrows, Kumi reluctantly fell into step behind Inako, who began trotting lightly ahead.

2.

“There was a strange machine at the Hyakugawa Shuzō main house called the *Ryōfūki*—a cooling device. It consisted of a rectangular box with a *uchiwa* fan inserted inside; when wound up, the fan moved up and down to blow air. In practice, though, every time it was used, it only sent out a faint, lukewarm breeze, making the room actually feel cooler once the spring had run down.

Yet perhaps this *Ryōfūki* had finally shown its power at last—the air in the sitting room now felt unusually chilly for summer.

Across from Kumi, seated at a rosewood table, sat his elder sister Noriko, back straight, in formal seiza posture.

Her pale skin and long, lustrous black hair hung straight down, a portion of it tied at the back with a red ribbon. She wore a high-quality summer kimono of *Ōmi jōfu* striped cotton, immaculately fastened with a purple *obi*.

As Kumi sipped the tea Noriko had poured, her previously closed eyes snapped sharply open.

“I was startled—what could possibly be the matter that you’d come so suddenly?”

“I was told to stay a while. I couldn’t very well refuse so rudely.”

“That odd uniform again—surely you’re meddling in some unnecessary business once more.”

“The Salvation Army established a Kyoto unit this year. A friend asked me to help out for a short time.”

“You’ve already spent the pension from your hard-earned war medal on all sorts of frivolous things, haven’t you.”

“It’s not for frivolity. Most of it goes toward charitable work.”

“How noble—chasing after fallen women. Truly admirable charity.”

“What are you saying—” “What is it?” Sparks flew between them in a fierce exchange of glances, and Inako pressed a hand to her forehead.

2.

It had been decided that Roku would be Noriko’s husband-to-be before the Russo-Japanese War even began. Roku was the second son of Riku Tsuneichi Shōten, a major rice wholesaler in Ōtsu who supplied the rice used in the Hyakugawa Shuzō brewery, and had been a familiar face to Noriko since childhood.  

Yet, problematically, the two were like cat and dog. Ever since they were young, Roku had always interfered in Noriko’s every move, and Noriko had responded with sarcasm and sharp-tongued remarks. Still, out of mutual obligation, they had continued to meet on formal terms—and though people had assumed they would marry after Roku completed his military service and was honorably discharged last December, there had still been no sign of any wedding preparations.  

Some whispered that Noriko had put the engagement on hold, frustrated by Roku’s obsession with charitable work. But when Inako asked for the full story, Noriko refused to say anything.  

This year, Roku would turn twenty-four, and Noriko twenty—yet both remained unmarried.  

Just as their glaring standoff reached its peak, the *Ryōfūki* stopped. Roku grimaced and glanced at the device.  

“I’ve been meaning to ask—why didn’t you just buy a battery-powered electric fan?”  

“Because this was cheaper,” Noriko replied dryly. “A classic case of *buy cheap, buy twice*, I suppose.”  

Roku nodded vaguely. “I see.” He drained the rest of his tea and set down his teacup.  

“Please,” he said curtly.  

Without a word, Noriko refilled his cup just as curtly.  

As Inako stood there, utterly exasperated by the pair’s behavior, the sliding door to the parlor slid open. “Roku, you’re here?” Her father, Jinbei’emon, peered in. Instantly, Inako’s stomach clenched tight.

---

2.

Dressed in matching *ōshima tsumugi* kimono and haori, Jinbei’emon had a composed demeanor, though his tightly closed mouth sported stiff Kaiser-style mustaches stretching sharply to either side. The moment he sat down and glanced at Inako, he said with unmistakable sarcasm,  
“So you’ve finally come back? Had your fill of gallivanting around, I suppose.”  

Jinbei’emon lit a Golden Bat cigarette and exhaled smoke without so much as a satisfied expression.  

“Mr. Jinbei’emon. I was told an important guest would be arriving soon.”  

“Good. Roku, you may stay as well. Our guest is Mr. Mishō Yōsuke—a man of the Mishō family, eldest son of Mishō Shōten. He’s just been appointed branch manager of their Fushimi branch and is coming to pay his respects.”  

Mishō Shōten was a wealthy merchant house headquartered in Matsusaka, long established as a liquor wholesaler. Since the Meiji era, they had followed the examples of Mitsui and Sumitomo, using their vast capital to expand into banking and coal mining operations.  

When the Battle of Toba–Fushimi devastated Fushimi, the Hyakugawa storehouse suffered partial damage, throwing their business into crisis. At that time, it was the Fushimi branch of Mishō Shōten that rescued them by distributing Fushimi sake to Tokyo—then an untapped market—as “downstream” sake, reviving their sales. Ever since, Mishō Shōten had remained a patron beyond repayment.  

“The previous branch manager was quite elderly. Does this Mr. Yōsuke have experience in trade?”  

“No need to worry on that count. After all, he is none other than the renowned Dr. Paikaru.”  

“Dr. Paikaru?” Roku exclaimed, eyes widening in surprise.

---

2.

During the Russo-Japanese War, there was a well-known professor at Imperial University who aggressively advocated that “Russia’s territory east of Lake Baikal should be ceded to Japan,” earning him the public nickname of “Dr. Baikal.”  

Around the same time, a strange figure emerged in the Kansai region. Though young, this man had traveled the world; upon returning to Japan, he had drunk every kind of liquor in every country he visited. He then established a new department for importing Western alcohol within his family’s store, and using the connections and distribution networks he had built overseas, rapidly expanded its business.

“I keep hearing rumors about this ‘Dr. Paikaru’—things like ‘he downed nearly two *shō* of wine in one go at a German village tavern,’ or ‘drank an entire *to* of liquor in Qing China and composed a hundred poems,’ or even ‘gets stronger in fights when drunk’—all of it sounds utterly dubious…”

His true nature remains largely unknown, overshadowed by outlandish and fantastical rumors. Yet one thing appears certain: at some point, he boldly declared,  
“Having tasted countless fine and rare liquors, I affirm that nothing surpasses Qing白酒—known also as *Paikaru*.”  

From then on, this man came to be spoken of alongside the aforementioned professor as “Baikal of the East, Paikaru of the West.”  

And this Dr. Paikaru—the very man who brought immense profits to Mitsue Shōten through imported spirits—was none other than their eldest son, Yōsuke.  

“He is, after all, the one destined to inherit the Mitsue household. …So, Inako. Be extremely careful not to cause any offense.”  

As Jinbei’emon fixed her with a stern glare, Inako stiffened—just as a maid called out from beyond the sliding door.

---

2.

“Fine daughters indeed. I’m nearly thirty myself and still unmarried—can’t say I understand the feelings of a parent with children, but it must be a joy to see such beauties grow up.”

“They’re still far from fully grown. Especially my second daughter—I’m at my wit’s end with how slow she is.”

“Did you say ‘Inako-chan’? How old are you, then?”

Startled by being addressed so suddenly, Inako stammered, “F-fifteen.”

Yōsuke rubbed his chin, watching her with keen interest. Seeing Inako fidgeting stiffly in formal seiza, Jinbei’emon seemed to fear she’d soon embarrass them all, and let out a sharp, deliberate cough.

“That’s enough greetings for now. Let me show you to the storehouse.”

The long, two-story sake warehouse stood adjacent to the main house, where brewing and storage operations were conducted. Sake was traditionally brewed in winter—called *kanzukuri*—when temperatures were ideal for fermentation, so at this time of year, the *kurabito* workers had returned to their hometowns to tend the fields, leaving the warehouse quiet and empty.

2.

“F-fifteen.” Yōsuke rubbed his chin, watching her with keen interest. Seeing Inako fidgeting stiffly in formal seiza, Jinbei’emon seemed to fear she’d soon embarrass them all, and let out a sharp, deliberate cough. “That’s enough greetings for now. Let me show you to the storehouse.”

The long, two-story sake warehouse stood adjacent to the main house, where brewing and storage operations were conducted. Sake was traditionally brewed in winter—called *kanzukuri*—when temperatures were ideal for fermentation, so at this time of year, the *kurabito* workers had returned to their hometowns to tend the fields, leaving the warehouse quiet and empty.

Jinbei’emon used his favorite bamboo-root-carved cane as a pointer, guiding Yōsuke through the storehouse. Nearby, Inako watched from a distance, while Roku stood beside her with arms crossed, silently observing. Noriko, who disliked the smell of the brewery, held a handkerchief to her pinched face.

“This is a magnificent storehouse,” Yōsuke said dramatically, spreading his arms wide. He had thought that Dr. Paikaru, who prided himself on having tasted every wine in the world, would naturally feel pride for his own country’s sake too—but then he added, “However,” sharply tapping his Western shoe against the floor.

“That is precisely why I am deeply uncertain whether Japanese sake can become a drink worthy of the new century.”

Inako could hardly believe her ears as Yōsuke spoke with solemn distress.

“Sake production depends on the grueling labor of *kurabito*, carries high risks of failure, and still relies mostly on human intuition rather than instruments. How can such an unstable drink, bound by the outdated notion of ‘tradition,’ possibly compete with foreign liquor?”

“What harsh words these are.”

Even as his own livelihood was being directly disparaged, Jinbei’emon merely smiled wryly. But Inako, whose insides churned with fury, raised her voice and stepped toward Yōsuke.

“That’s not right at all! The techniques of the *tōji* master brewers and the *kurabito* have been passed down and refined over hundreds of years. Without relying on thermometers, our brewers can judge the temperature of water with just their fingertips!”

Yōsuke, eyes widening in surprise, soon twisted his mouth into the mischievous grin of a child who has just conceived a prank.

2.

"But how many years does it take for an individual to master that skill? And even if someone claims to have perfected it, how can you prove it? I think sticking in a thermometer is much quicker."

"That’s…," Inako faltered, at a loss for words.

"Still, everyone works with care and sincerity. Sake is the drink of the gods, after all."

Yōsuke stared blankly for a moment, then burst into loud laughter that echoed throughout the vast brewery.

"I give up, I give up. You win. When someone drags the gods into an argument, there's no fighting back. ...But if it's such a sacred drink, then why does the sake spoil during brewing? If its quality depends entirely on the capricious will of the gods, no matter how devoutly you pray, believing in it is just a waste."

As Inako opened her mouth to retort, Jinbei’emon’s cane sharply tapped her arm.

"Hold your tongue. I told you not to meddle in sake-making."

Jinbei’emon gave her a cold, indifferent stare as Inako winced from the pain. She tried to protest again, but Roku gently grasped her shoulder, forcing her to fall silent.

"She’s quite spirited," Yōsuke said with a smile, his gaze clinging to Inako like syrup.

That night, having changed into their sleeping garments, Inako and Noriko stood together on the veranda lit by a paper lantern. Both wore plain white *chirimen* cotton yukata—Inako’s patterned with blue *fuki* (butterbur), Noriko’s with blue *ayame* (iris).

2.

Jinbei’emon’s cane sharply tapped her arm. "Hold your tongue. I told you not to meddle in sake-making." Jinbei’emon gave her a cold, indifferent stare as Inako winced from the pain. She tried to protest again, but Roku gently grasped her shoulder, forcing her to fall silent. "She’s quite spirited," Yōsuke said with a smile, his gaze clinging to Inako like syrup. That night, having changed into their sleeping garments, Inako and Noriko stood together on the veranda lit by a paper lantern. Both wore plain white *chirimen* cotton yukata—Inako’s patterned with blue *fuki* (butterbur), Noriko’s with blue *ayame* (iris).

Letting their hair down, Noriko continued playing a leisurely tune on the shamisen, while Inako sat on the veranda, swinging her legs and listening to the music. Through the space between the persimmon tree planted in the inner garden and the eaves, the starry sky peeked through, and now and then the smoke from a mosquito-repelling coil tickled Inako’s nose as she gazed upward.

“I was terrified when you suddenly defied Dr. Paikaru in broad daylight,” Noriko said, not pausing her playing.

“Well, he said something insulting, like we’re just dumb kurabito.”

“In situations like that, you just pretend not to hear. You don’t take everything so seriously.”

“You can say that because you’re skilled at everything.”

Inako had always felt that compared to her sister, there were far too many things she couldn’t do. Noriko was proper in conduct, elegant, and talented—flawless in everything she undertook. She played countless shamisen tunes, poured tea so refined it made guests hum “mumu,” and sewed garments fit for a wedding ceremony.

In contrast, Inako was clumsy and inept at everything. She had broken countless shamisen strings, poured tea so bad it made guests grunt “ugh,” and when she tried sewing, she produced a massive *teru teru bōzu* large enough to hang under the eaves.

“All I’ve got going for me is praying to the gods.”

“That’s not true at all. You’ve got plenty of things I don’t.”

Inako turned to look at her, skeptical, but Noriko kept playing the shamisen with a composed expression. The instrument’s body rested against her right thigh as she sat in seiza, and Inako laid her head on Noriko’s left thigh, sprawling lazily on her side.

2.

“Nako, you’re in the way,” Noriko said, offering a token warning, but didn’t stop playing.

Inako soaked in the soft warmth, gently combing her fingers through Noriko’s hair that spilled over her sleeping clothes.

Inako’s dark blue *kasuri* kimono was made of the same *Ōmi jōfu* fabric as Noriko’s white *kasuri*, but because Inako constantly snagged and frayed it, the cloth had become badly worn. That’s why every time she asked to borrow Noriko’s white *kasuri*, she was flatly refused: “If I lend it to you, it’ll come back looking like a dishrag.”

Noriko—with her refined beauty, long, lustrous black hair, and elegant white *kasuri*—was Inako’s ideal. Secretly, Inako rejoiced that her own hair, which she had painstakingly grown out, was finally nearing the same length as Noriko’s.

“Hey, Onee-chan… When are you and Roku-san going to make up?”

“What’s brought this on all of a sudden?”

“I keep trying to get you two together, but you just keep fighting.”

“Don’t go meddling. Think about your own future. You’re old enough to marry now, you know.”

Inako’s heart leapt. That’s right—she was at an age where marriage wouldn’t be surprising at all. She let her thoughts wander: what kind of man would she end up marrying? But then again, whether anyone would even have her was questionable.

“If I were to marry, I’d want someone like Roku-san. He’s strong, and dependable.”

“Oh really? Well then, I’ll give him to you anytime.”

Noriko said it calmly, without a trace of jealousy, then slightly twisted her lips into a mischievous smirk.

“Tell me, what would you do if your suitor turned out to be Dr. Paikaru?”

2.

Her heart leapt. That’s right—she was at an age where marriage wouldn’t be surprising at all. She let her thoughts wander: what kind of man would she end up marrying? But then again, whether anyone would even have her was questionable.  
“If I were to marry, I’d want someone like Roku-san. He’s strong, and dependable.”  
“Oh really? Well then, I’ll give him to you anytime.” Noriko said it calmly, without a trace of jealousy, then slightly twisted her lips into a mischievous smirk. “Tell me, what would you do if your suitor turned out to be Dr. Paikaru?”

“Absolutely not. Those sideburns look like centipede antennae—just looking at them makes my skin crawl.”

“Same here,” Noriko replied with a faint smile, and the two of them giggled together.

A week had passed. Since morning, the sun had been blazing, and the oppressive, steamy heat made it feel like a boiling cauldron from hell. Just as she was growing weary of it, Yōsuke arrived again. He seemed to have something important to discuss, and was engaged in a long conversation with Jinbei’emon in the guest room.

Since the maids were busy, Inako took the Ryōfūki to the guest room instead. Carefully supporting the device with both hands, she approached the guest room—and paused just outside, catching the conversation through the fusuma.

“That’s precisely why I believe the secret sake once brewed by Miss Hyakugawa is exactly the kind of drink suited for the twentieth century. Wouldn’t you consider brewing it again?”

*Secret sake?* Inako perked up, unable to help listening in.

“I don’t know what the previous branch manager told you, but that is certainly not a product capable of meeting Mr. Mitsue’s expectations.”

“As you know, we’re currently in a postwar depression, and frankly speaking, sales of Hyakugawa’s sake haven’t been favorable. It’s about time you produced something that would awaken the people’s interest.”

In response to Jinbei’emon’s silence, Yōsuke clicked his tongue.

“If you’re unable to do that… how about this—why not take this opportunity to switch over to a beer brewery?”

The Ryōfūki slipped from Jinbei’emon’s suddenly limp hands.

By the time Inako gasped, it was too late—the device crashed to the floor with a piercing clatter.

2.

“What’s this?” Jinbei’emon appeared from the guest room, and upon seeing the disaster, immediately glared at Inako.  
“Ah… um… it was hot, so I brought the Ryōfūki…”  

Jinbei’emon shoved past Inako and picked up the fallen cooling device lying on the floor. He reattached the detached *uchiwa* fan and wound the spring. Inako watched anxiously, praying for it to work—but the machine emitted only a grating noise, as if its gears refused to mesh. The fan remained lifeless, and her stomach twisted into knots.  

“Is this the best you can do?! Can’t even carry a simple thing properly, you fool!”  

As Jinbei’emon’s thunderous rebuke left her trembling to the core, Yōsuke strolled in, disturbingly unperturbed.  
“Haha. So ‘slow-witted’ really does apply.”  

“I deeply apologize. I’ve made a terrible spectacle of myself.”  

Ignoring Jinbei’emon’s bow, Inako timidly spoke up: “Um… that earlier talk about the beer factory… was that really true?”  

Yōsuke blinked once, then burst into genuine laughter.  
“Of course it was a joke. You actually believed me? How refreshingly gullible.”  

*A joke.* Inako had barely registered the relief when Jinbei’emon’s roar snapped her back to reality.  
“Mind your own damn business! And more importantly—what do you plan to do about *this* mess?!”  

Jolted by the outburst, Inako shrank down once more.  
“Y-yes… um… I know someone who could fix it…”  

She darted away like a fugitive and returned moments later, clutching the蓬莱仏具店’s signboard from her room.  

2.

“Um… that earlier talk about the beer factory… was that really true?” Yōsuke blinked once, then burst into genuine laughter. “Of course it was a joke. You actually believed me? How refreshingly gullible.” *A joke.* Inako had barely registered the relief when Jinbei’emon’s roar snapped her back to reality. “Mind your own damn business! And more importantly—what do you plan to do about *this* mess?!” Jolted by the outburst, Inako shrank down once more. “Y-yes… um… I know someone who could fix it…” She darted away like a fugitive and returned moments later, clutching the Hōrai Butsugu-ten’s signboard from her room.

Jinbei’emon took the signboard but eyed it skeptically. “A *Buddhist goods shop* doing mechanical repairs?”

“I wondered the same,” Inako replied, “but the person who gave me this seemed to know quite a bit about machines.”

“This smells fishy. There’s a phone number, but no way to verify it.”

“In that case, let me check it for you,” said Yōsuke, pulling a thick directory of Kyoto phone numbers from his large bag. “I carry it for work. Lucky timing.”

While Yōsuke looked up the number, Inako watched anxiously. Moments later, he looked up and smiled. “Found it.” A wave of relief washed over her.

“Though—it’s listed under a different name: ‘Rokkaku Dry Goods Store.’”  

At Yōsuke’s next words, Inako froze, her hopeful expression still fixed on her face.

Jinbei’emon let out a deep, weary sigh, as if wrung from every fiber of his body.  

“To embarrass yourself in front of customers, only to end up duped by some shady character whose identity we can’t even confirm… Just how much must you disgrace the Hyakugawa name before you’re satisfied?”

“Father, please listen—I never meant—”

Jinbei’emon swung the cane he was holding and brought it down sharply on Inako’s head. A searing pain shot through her skull, blurring her vision with tears. Yōsuke gave a small chuckle. “Now, now, Mr. Hyakugawa…”

“Inako-chan is an honest girl. She’s the type who’d say sake is the drink of the gods without thinking.”

“No, she’s just dull-witted. …Go back to your room. Excuse us, gentlemen—we’ll continue our discussion later.”

With heavy, furious breaths, Jinbei’emon strode back into the reception room.

2.

“How much more must you disgrace the Hyakugawa name before you’re satisfied?”  
“Father, please listen—I never meant—”  
Jinbei’emon swung the cane he was holding and brought it down sharply on Inako’s head. A searing pain shot through her skull, blurring her vision with tears. Yōsuke gave a small chuckle.  
“Now, now, Mr. Hyakugawa…”  
“Inako-chan is an honest girl. She’s the type who’d say sake is the drink of the gods without thinking.”  
“No, she’s just dull-witted. …Go back to your room. Excuse us, gentlemen—we’ll continue our discussion later.”  
With heavy, furious breaths, Jinbei’emon strode back into the reception room.

When Yōsuke was about to return the signboard with a muttered, “What a disaster,” he paused, catching sight of the writing on its reverse side.  
“What’s this?” he said, scanning the back—and instantly, the smile vanished from his face.  
“*Denki Mokuroku*…”  
His voice was one of utter disbelief. Noticing Inako’s gaze, Yōsuke quickly handed the signboard back. “Well then,” he said, forcing a smile before stepping into the parlor.  
In the now-quiet hallway, Inako traced the phone number on the signboard with downcast eyes. Then her gaze was suddenly drawn to the address scribbled beside it.  
It read: Shin-Kyōgoku.  
A faint glimmer of determination flickered in Inako’s eyes as she stared at the signboard.

That same afternoon. Carrying a *ryōfūki* wrapped in a furoshiki, Inako rode north along Kawaramachi-dōri on the tram.  
It had been years since she’d last come this way—since childhood, when she’d visited the Great Buddha at Hōkō-ji. As she gazed out the window, a sudden sight startled her: a pointed roof and a brick Western-style church. A woman beside her explained it was the newly built St. John’s Church, completed this year. Its pristine, majestic appearance moved Inako so deeply that she instinctively clasped her hands and bowed.

Continuing along Kitayama-dōri, where lush willows lined the banks of the Takase River, she disembarked at Shijō-Kobashi stop. She walked west along Shijō-dōri, a narrow street cutting through the city from east to west, and arrived at Shin-Kyōgoku-dōri.

Shin-Kyōgoku-dōri, established in the early Meiji era, was Kyoto’s liveliest district. Along the thoroughfare stood hat shops, *geta* stores, and theaters, bustling with housewives accompanied by maids, elderly men with shaved heads, and students. Under the harsh summer sun, nearly everyone frantically waved fans or *uchiwa* to cool their faces.

2.

Every tea shop along the way displayed signs reading “Ice Shop.” Workers sat on benches beneath the eaves, savoring ice sprinkled with sugar or ramune, while girls in hakama raised playful cries outside the Komachikurenai boutique. Glancing at them, Inako arrived at the address marked on the signboard—but found no likely shop in sight.

“This should be the area…”

As she wandered uncertainly back and forth, she accidentally bumped into a passing boy. He tumbled over, spilling a large quantity of canes he’d been carrying in a basket on his back across the ground.

“Sorry! I wasn’t paying attention!”

“No, no, don’t worry about it. Getting knocked over by such a beautiful lady is more than worth it.”

The boy, his kimono tucked up at the hem and wearing a happi coat labeled “Yagura Takeyukibuchi Craft Shop” at the collar, sprang to his feet with a flippant remark and grinned brightly, his face smeared with grime.

He looks like a smaller version of Kihachi, Inako thought. As she handed him the picked-up canes, the boy noticed the signboard and let out a soft “Oh?”

“Hey, big sis—could it be you’re looking for Hōrai Butsugu-ten?”

“Huh? Y-yes… I got lost…”

“In that case, I’ll show you the way. I was heading there myself anyway.”

Without waiting for her reply, the boy started walking off. Inako hesitated—unsure what else to do—but since she had no other leads, she decided to follow his small back.

“You’re acquainted with Mr. Sakamoto?”  

2.

and grinned brightly, his face smeared with grime. He looks like a smaller version of Kihachi, Inako thought. As she handed him the picked-up canes, the boy noticed the signboard and let out a soft “Oh?”  
“Hey, big sis—could it be you’re looking for Hōrai Butsugu-ten?”  
“Huh? Y-yes… I got lost…”  
“In that case, I’ll show you the way. I was heading there myself anyway.”  

Without waiting for her reply, the boy started walking off. Inako hesitated—unsure what else to do—but since she had no other leads, she decided to follow his small back.  
“You’re acquainted with Mr. Sakamoto?”

2.

“My name’s Yajiro Yamazaki. You here to see Big Bro Kihachi?”  

“Yeah. I need him to fix my *Ryōfūki*.”  

“Heh, he’ll be thrilled—loves mechanical repairs. See? Right there.”  

Hōrai Butsugu-ten was nestled inside a narrow alleyway. Passing through the entrance beneath a large signboard, the dim interior displayed an array of Buddhist goods: candles, incense, rosaries, and other ritual items neatly arranged on shelves.  

Yajiro called toward the back, “Excuse me—this is Yajiro.”  

“Big bro, I brought a customer! Uh…”  

He glanced at her briefly. “Her name’s Hundred Rivers Inako.”  

“*Kinako*-san?” Yajiro offered.  

“It’s *Inako*!” she snapped, correcting him sharply.  

From deep within the earthen-floored workshop, someone burst into loud laughter.  

“What’s this, Yajiro? Back from your sales run already?”  

Emerging still chuckling, Kihachi appeared unchanged—his smug grin as ever present.  

“I was out showing product samples to customers. Then on the way back, I ran into Kinako-san here.”  

After exchanging a few quick words with Kihachi, Yajiro cheerfully declared, “Well then, see you at the next Night Study Meeting!” and bounded off. Watching him go, Kihachi turned back to Inako, still unable to suppress his amusement.  

“Sorry for keeping you waiting, uh… *Kinako*-san,” he said, grinning.  

Without hesitation, she kicked him hard in the shin.  

“Ow! What the hell was that for?!” he protested.  

Baring her teeth in a sharp, furious grimace, Inako shot back,  
“How dare you give me such a ridiculous phone number! Thanks to you, I nearly ended up in serious trouble!”

---

2.

“Nonsense?” Kihachi tilted his head, puzzled—just as the telephone in the neighboring house began to ring shrilly.

Soon, someone answered, and the bell fell silent. After a brief pause,  
a white-haired old man suddenly burst into the shop, shouting, “Is Bunshichi there?!”

“Uh…?” came a drowsy voice from the back. A middle-aged man wearing glasses and a happi coat emerged, scratching at his unruly hair. Flakes drifted from his scalp—he was almost certainly Bunshichi.

“Ah, Mr. Kimono Shop, good day,” he said lazily.

“It’s not ‘good day’! That damn phone rang again—another call for *me* at *your* place!”

“Sorry ’bout that… So, uh, what’d the caller say?”

“I hung up right away! Now hurry up and erase that phone number from your signboard!”

As I watched the exchange, I turned to Kihachi. “What’s going on?”

“Well, see, writin’ a phone number on the sign makes customers trust you more. But we can’t afford the annual fee, so my uncle went and borrowed the number from Rokkaku Kimono Shop next door.”

Kihachi looked exasperated, while Bunshichi calmly placated the old man.

“Don’t worry, we pay our share for the trouble, don’t we?”

“Then pay me nuisance damages too! Calls meant for *me* keep coming nonstop!”

As the two bickered, Inako leaned close to Kihachi and whispered,  
“That kimono shop guy’s got guts, answering the phone like that. I’d be too scared.”

“What, you nervous about talking to an operator?”

---

2.

“If the other person’s got cholera, what then? I heard you can catch it through the phone.”

“No way that’s possible.”

Kihachi pressed a hand to his temple as if dealing with someone decades behind the times, when Bunshichi interjected, “Now, now, we’re in front of customers,” and gently led the still-fuming kimono shop owner toward the back.

“It’s fine. Just leave it be.”

“Yeah, don’t worry. That Mr. Kimono Shop’s actually a chatterbox—he uses wrong-number calls as an excuse to shoot the breeze.”

As Inako watched them disappear, wondering if this was truly harmless, she met Kihachi’s eyes—he stood with arms crossed, gaze unreadable.

He quickly looked away. “...Well… sorry about that. Should’ve explained properly when I gave you the signboard.”

“Forget it. I came all this way myself and now I know your shop really exists.”

“You believed me enough to come all this way?”

“Believing’s my specialty. Besides, I *had* to get this fixed.”

She pulled the Ryōfūki from its furoshiki wrapping. Kihachi leaned in sharply. “A Ryōfūki?”

After dropping it, it had stopped working. “Here—this is partial payment.”

“Oho. Biscuits. And high-quality ones at that.”

He helped himself to a couple from the snacks kept for guests. Taking the package from Inako, he immediately plucked one out and began nibbling cheaply at it with his front teeth.

“Might be fixable quick. Wait here a moment, would you?”

She nodded—then suddenly, a sharp bell rang out. Inako flinched, her shoulders jerking violently.

2.

Glancing at the wall clock, she saw it was already three o’clock. Kihachi placed the Ryōfūki on a workbench in the corner and immediately began disassembling it. The bench was cluttered with various types of mantel clocks, as well as unidentifiable machines and parts.

As Inako gazed at these objects—clearly distinct from the other Buddhist paraphernalia—Kihachi suddenly announced, “Done.”

“Eh? Already fixed?”

“Fixing mechanical things that don’t use electricity? That’s child’s play. The gear had just come loose, that’s all.”

Amazed by his astonishing speed, Inako watched as Kihachi wound the spring; instantly, the Ryōfūki’s *uchiwa* began to spin cheerfully, delivering the long-awaited lukewarm breeze.

“Wow, thank you so much,” Inako said, her hand resting over her heart in relief—but Kihachi stood with arms crossed, looking dissatisfied.

“Even if it’s working, this lukewarm wind… I can’t honestly say I’m happy with it.”

As Inako wrapped the Ryōfūki back into its furoshiki, the same sharp bell rang out again.

“Perfect timing. Look, the tea’s ready.”

Kihachi pointed at a machine on the workbench. Puzzled, Inako turned to look—and fell speechless. A kettle, propped up on the machine, was pouring boiling water all by itself into a teapot.

“You’re surprised, aren’t you? I built this based on an English automatic tea maker. It’s connected to the alarm clock I installed—when the time comes, the alcohol lamp underneath ignites automatically, and then, just like a karakuri puppet, it pours the boiled water into the teapot filled with tea leaves.”

2.

Back into its furoshiki, the same sharp bell rang out again. “Perfect timing. Look, the tea’s ready.” Kihachi pointed at a machine on the workbench. Puzzled, Inako turned to look—and fell speechless. A kettle, propped up on the machine, was pouring boiling water all by itself into a teapot.  

“You’re surprised, aren’t you? I built this based on an English automatic tea maker. It’s connected to the alarm clock I installed—when the time comes, the alcohol lamp underneath ignites automatically, and then, just like a *karakuri* puppet, it pours the boiled water into the teapot filled with tea leaves.”

Kihachi poured tea from the *kyūsu* into prepared teacups and handed one to Inako. The flavor wasn’t quite as refined as Noriko’s tea, but surprisingly pleasant. As a confection to accompany it, Kihachi added a single biscuit.

“This here’s a Buddhist goods shop, right?”

“That’s the main trade. But since I can handle simple mechanical repairs, I take repair orders, and if they cover material costs, I’ll build things to request.”

“Wait—so this tea-brewing alarm thing… is it for sale?”

When Kihachi nodded while chewing a biscuit, Inako made a grimace.

“Don’t make that face. Before delivery, I test everything myself.”

Still bewildered at how casually he operated, Inako let her eyes wander over the machines on the workbench.

“Got any other alarm clocks? If there’s one that makes it hard to oversleep, I might buy it.”

“Oh, plenty. I’ve even got some prototypes I tinkered with myself—they’ll wake you up all right.”

At the word *prototype*, Inako remembered and showed Kihachi the signboard she’d brought.

“This signboard—you wrote ‘*Denki Mokuroku*’ on the back. Was it important?”

The cheerful expression on Kihachi’s face darkened slightly.

“…Crap. Did I accidentally hand over the signboard I was using as a notebook?”

“If it’s instructions for making something, maybe I should give it back.”

“No need. It was just me idly designing a prophecy machine I thought up long ago.”

“Prophecy?”

“A book I once wrote called *Denki Mokuroku*—it lists twenty things electricity will achieve within the next hundred years.”

2.

“Wake you up all right.” At the word *prototype*, Inako remembered and showed Kihachi the signboard she’d brought. “This signboard—you wrote ‘*Denki Mokuroku*’ on the back. Was it important?”  

The cheerful expression on Kihachi’s face darkened slightly. “…Crap. Did I accidentally hand over the signboard I was using as a notebook?”  
“If it’s instructions for making something, maybe I should give it back.”  
“No need. It was just me idly designing a prophecy machine I thought up long ago.”  
“Prophecy?”  
“A book I once wrote called *Denki Mokuroku*—it lists twenty things electricity will achieve within the next hundred years.”  

Watching Kihachi blush shyly, a mischievous impulse stirred in Inako.  

“There’s other prophecies, right? Let me see that book for a sec.”  

Anyone would feel embarrassed having childhood scribbles shown to someone else.  

“…That’s ancient history. I lost it ages ago.”  

Inako sighed, disappointed. “I see.” She sipped the now-lukewarm dregs of her tea.  

“Guess you’ve run out of things to tease me with.”  
“N-no, I don’t think anything like that!”  

Startled by the direct hit, Kihachi flinched. As they idly chatted and munched on biscuits, a sudden burst of laughter erupted from the back of the shop. Just as Kihachi had said, the kimono merchant, his anger apparently cooled, was now deeply engaged in casual talk with Bunshichi. Inako glanced at the wall clock—already, far more time had passed than she’d realized.  

“It’s this late already. I’d better head home.”  

Kihachi offered to walk her to the nearby Keiden stop, so the two of them left the shop together. They strolled down the evening-tinged Shin-Kyōgoku, descended the gently sloping Tatarazaka, then turned right onto Sanjō-dōri, famed for its brick buildings and post office.  

Glancing briefly at the clock tower of Ibaye Tokuya Clock Shop, bathed in the setting sun, Inako asked Kihachi a question.  

“Mr. Sakamoto, are you planning to work in the electrical field someday?”  
“More electricity than machinery. I want to go to university, study, and then join an electric power company or a firm that makes electrical products. Ideally, one like ‘Japan’s Edison’—that’d be perfect.”  

2.

So the two of them left the shop together. They strolled down the evening-tinged Shin-Kyōgoku, descended the gently sloping Tatarazaka, then turned right onto Sanjō-dōri, famed for its brick buildings and post office. Glancing briefly at the clock tower of Ibaye Tokuya Clock Shop, bathed in the setting sun, Inako asked Kihachi a question.  
“Mr. Sakamoto, are you planning to work in the electrical field someday?”  
“More electricity than machinery. I want to go to university, study, and then join an electric power company or a firm that makes electrical products. Ideally, one like ‘Japan’s Edison’—that’d be perfect.”  

The man known as Japan’s Edison, who ran a physical and chemical instrument manufacturing business in Nijō, was apparently an exceptionally insightful individual. When he was the same age as Kihachi, it was said he had replicated a Western electrostatic generator just from looking at a single illustration.  
Afterward, he succeeded in domestically producing storage batteries; these were used in the navy’s new wireless devices and greatly contributed to the Combined Fleet’s victory over Russia’s Baltic Fleet in the Battle of Tsushima.  
“They say his workshop is now developing a medical X-ray apparatus.”  

While half-listening to Kihachi’s complicated explanations, Inako suddenly spotted ahead of them the circular stained-glass window of Saint Francis Xavier Cathedral. Instinctively, she clasped her hands toward the stark white church.  

Perhaps annoyed at having his story interrupted, Kihachi pouted his lips in displeasure.  
“You… you believe in Christianity too?”  
“No, I don’t. But Jesus-san is a great god, isn’t he? I heard from Mr. Roku that he healed the sick and even rose from the dead. It doesn’t hurt to bow and receive some blessing.”  
“Sounds like a pretty fishy story to me. How come civilized Westerners believe such tall tales?”  
“Sakamoto-san, you were born in a temple. How can you speak so disrespectfully about other people’s faith?”  
“That’s precisely why I can. I’ve seen up close monks chanting scriptures they don’t understand, charging money for dharma names and other things that bring no real benefit. Religion is just about scaring believers with talk of hell and divine retribution to make a profit.”  

As Kihachi looked up at the cathedral, his eyes took on that same resentful glare Inako had once seen before the sacred mound.

---

2.

“An age of blindly believing in gods and Buddha is over. Just as X-rays have made visible what the eye could not see, electricity will now expose one by one the true nature of miracles and curses.”

*Exposing God.* Those words sent an unpleasant throb deep within Inako’s chest.

“Instead of doing nothing gods, electricity will power machines and enrich people’s lives, enrich the world itself.”

Kihachi raised his eyes to the sky and declared loudly, his face brimming with confidence.

“The Twentieth Century is the century of electricity.”

“…There’s no way electricity can replace God.”

Taken aback—perhaps not expecting his words to be so directly challenged—Kihachi wore a stunned expression.

“God exists. That’s what Mother always said. She told me there are countless invisible gods in sake. If you cut corners, the gods spoil the brew; but if you honor them, dedicating yourself wholeheartedly to the craft, the gods within the sake lend their hands and make it delicious. No matter how powerful electricity may be—it can never replace God.”

“A load of nonsense.”

Inako’s argument was cut short by Kihachi’s cold retort.

“Now we can see even the tiniest things through electric microscopes. With tools like that, we’ll soon uncover the true identity of these so-called gods. The Twentieth Century is an era where intuition and tradition—the inefficient ways of craftsmen—are replaced. Even sake brewing will be done by electricity. We won’t need to pray to any gods—we’ll still be able to brew delicious sake.”

At that moment, the mocking face of Yōsuke, who had ridiculed the brewery work, flashed in Inako’s mind, and her irritation surged violently.

“Saying ‘sake made by the power of God’—that sounds suspicious, all right. Sounds just like a swindler’s sales pitch.”

2.

He sneered mockingly through his nose, as if deliberately provoking her.  

“Mrs. Locust—ain’t you just a swindler?”

Her head, boiling with irritation like bubbling water, had finally reached its limit.  

“It’s electricity that doesn’t matter whether it exists or not!”  

“…What’d you say?”  

“What do you mean, ‘the Century of Electricity’? Phonographs and clocks run on springs, and most shops don’t even have electric lights. How many people in this day and age actually depend on electricity to live? Lamps give plenty of light, trains are faster than electric trams, and you can boil water just fine with gas. Electricity makes no difference—it’s the same either way!”  

For once, Kihachi was at a loss for words. This time, it was Inako who scoffed at him through her nose.  

“How ridiculous you look, Sakamoto-san, so infatuated with electricity. You’re saying the exact same things as those monks you despise. Clinging desperately to the power of electricity—which doesn’t matter whether it exists or not.”  

Deep wrinkles gathered sharply between Kihachi’s brows, and his clenched fists began to tremble slightly.  

“That *Denki Mokuroku*—it’s just a prophecy book written by a con artist.”  

Ding, ding—the hollow, foolish chime of a bell rang out. They hadn’t noticed, but they’d already arrived at the Keiden tram stop.  

“Enough. Go home.”  

In a low voice, Kihachi spoke quietly. Without even glancing back at him, Inako leapt onto the moving train.  

Once seated, she slumped forward and leaned her forehead weakly against the *Ryōfūki*.  

  

Unpleasant things always come in succession. When she returned to Fushimi, she ended up having dinner with Yōsuke, who was still at home.

2.

At the table where the meal was laid out, Yōsuke reached for a mackerel sushi without particularly looking pleased.  
“Is it tasty?” asked Jinbei’emon, pouring him more sake.  
“It’s excellent,” Yōsuke replied—safe, noncommittal words.

“Mr. Yōsuke, do you have any favorite fish?”

At Jinbei’emon’s question, Yōsuke paused in thought, his face already flushed from drinking.

“Pacific saury.”

“I see. Indeed, autumn saury, rich with fat, are delicious.”

“No—I prefer saury caught just *before* their peak season. I once had sashimi of saury at that time. It was truly remarkable. Delicately sweet—and above all—”

His eyes snapped toward Inako, sharp and unblinking. She froze as if struck by paralysis.

“The firm, crisp texture of the flesh—the tautness you never get in fully matured saury—that is what I find utterly irresistible.”

A sensation like thousands of centipedes crawling all over her body surged through Inako. She quickly averted her gaze.

She simply couldn’t stand this man Dr. Paikaru. Ever since dinner began, time had felt terrifyingly slow, and a tight, queasy weight pressed on her chest.

Back at Hōrai Butsugu-ten, when they were drinking tea, time had flown by in an instant.

Remembering Sakamoto Kihachi’s scoffing smirk, Inako set down her chopsticks as if to shake off her melancholy, gave a slight bow to those around, and left the room. Wandering aimlessly through the house, she eventually found herself in the kitchen.

2.

Like thousands of centipedes crawling all over her body, a crawling sensation surged through Inako. She quickly averted her gaze. She simply couldn’t stand this man, Dr. Paikaru. Ever since dinner began, time had felt terrifyingly slow, and a tight, queasy weight pressed on her chest. Back at Hōrai Butsugu-ten, when they were drinking tea, time had flown by in an instant. Remembering Sakamoto Kihachi’s scoffing smirk, Inako set down her chopsticks as if to shake off her melancholy, gave a slight bow to those around, and left the room. Wandering aimlessly through the house, she eventually found herself in the kitchen.

The maids were all out, and the pot of water heating sake on the *okudo* was boiling. Seeing it, Inako rolled up her sleeves and gently dipped her index finger into the simmering water.

Just hot enough to trace the character *no* on the surface with her fingertip.

The temperature for pasteurizing sake—her mother had taught her this long ago. If it were any hotter, the flavor of the sake would be ruined; any cooler, bacteria would multiply and spoil the brew.

Finding it too lukewarm, Inako added a few more logs to stoke the fire.

“Does that sort of gathering make you uneasy?”

Yōsuke’s voice came softly from behind her shoulder, and Inako flinched. She turned and stepped back, only to find herself half-pressed against the *okudo* as Yōsuke, his neck flushed bright red from drinking, let out a hoarse hiccup.

“Was that a pasteurizing practice just now? Why on earth is Inako-chan doing something like that?”

“Sometimes, when I want to clear my head, I practice it. It calms me down.”

“You’re still the same baffling girl,” Yōsuke sneered with a mocking smile.

“But you know… from now on, you won’t need to do things like that anymore.”

Yōsuke suddenly leaned in. Inako, half-trapped with her back against the hearth, felt the heat at her back.

“What are you talking about?” she asked, her face stiff with tension.

Yōsuke’s mouth twisted into a leer, his breath reeking of alcohol, so close she could feel its warmth.

“You’re going to be my wife, after all.”

A dry, cracking sound split the air—the sound of firewood splitting.

She didn’t understand what he had just said. Had she misheard?

2.

Yōsuke sneered with a mocking smile. “But you know… from now on, you won’t need to do things like that anymore.” Yōsuke suddenly leaned in. Inako, half-trapped with her back against the hearth, felt the heat at her back. “What are you talking about?” she asked, her face stiff with tension. Yōsuke’s mouth twisted into a leer, his breath reeking of alcohol, so close she could feel its warmth. “You’re going to be my wife, after all.” A dry, cracking sound split the air—the sound of firewood splitting. She didn’t understand what he had just said. Had she misheard?

“Um… aren’t you too drunk? I’ll bring you some water.”

“This is serious. I’ve taken a liking to you. You *will* become the bride of the Mitsue family.”

Yōsuke’s hand settled on Inako’s shoulder, pressing down as if crushing the last flicker of hope still lingering within her.

All the blood drained from her body. Her feet no longer felt grounded—she was adrift in a sickening daze. Her head throbbed and swayed, a hollow ringing filling her ears. She tried to speak, but no words came out.

“If you become my wife, you won’t have to waste your time on foolish distractions anymore. Jewels, fine kimonos, steak, cake—you’ll live in such luxury, you won’t even have room to worry.”

*Paradise*, Inako’s lips moved silently—but she violently shook her head, rejecting it.

“T-That’s very kind of you, but I can’t possibly imagine someone like me becoming Dr. Paikaru’s wife…”

“But you must. Your father and I have already made an arrangement.”

Inako could no longer think straight. Her mind felt like a lotus root—hollowed out, full of holes.

“The Mitsue shop has done everything for the Hyakugawa family. We’ve even provided financial support from our bank when needed. But Mr. Hyakugawa refuses every request we make—says he doesn’t want to brew new sake. That’s simply unreasonable… Still, I’m not a monster. So I made the suggestion half in jest:”

Yōsuke raised his index finger sharply.

“If you, Miss Inako, agree to marry me, I’ll ensure he’s allowed to keep brewing exactly as he does now.”

“…So you threatened my father with that?”

2.

“No wonder a girl who’s never known hardship, always relying on others, turns out this way. Think about it—your slow-witted daughter gets a husband, and the brewery is saved too. For the Hyakugawa family, isn’t it nothing but gain?”

“So my feelings don’t matter at all?”

“Feelings?” Yōsuke snorted derisively, as if he found the very idea absurd. “Do you really think someone whose only value is becoming my wife has the right to be picky?”

A sharp pain pierced Inako’s heart, while Yōsuke’s smile twisted into something vulgar.

“Well, just suppose you refuse this marriage… then this morning’s little joke might just become reality.”

——They’d force the family to abandon sake brewing entirely and convert the brewery into a beer plant instead.

Blazing fury surged through her, scalding her insides, and Inako glared fiercely at Yōsuke.

“If you think we’re such worthless people, then why choose me in the first place?”

Suddenly, Yōsuke’s palm slid slowly, slickly over Inako’s right cheek—and she froze, every limb locking in shock.

“That timid little act of yours—it excites a man. No pretense, so honest… and above all—”

Just as she felt a revolting sensation like centipedes crawling across her skin and was about to scream, a maid burst into the earthen floor area, face drained of color. “Miss! Get away from him!”

For one fleeting moment, Inako rejoiced—*help has come*—but in the next instant, the maid shoved her aside and shrieked, “Fire!”

Inako stumbled and fell. When she scrambled back up, she saw blazing fire erupting where a log had slipped and landed just before the *okudo*.

“What’s all this ruckus?!”

Rushing in, Jinbei’emon took in the scene at a glance and barked at the maid, “Use the water from the *mizubīru*!”

2.

Seeing Inako still rolling on the earthen floor, Jinbei’emon’s eyes widened in shock.

He stepped down into the dirt-floored area—and to his astonishment, saw her lunging toward him, clutching a kitchen knife taken from the sink.

—I’m going to die. The moment the thought struck, her legs gave out. She dropped onto her backside and scrambled backward across the floor. But Jinbei’emon closed the distance effortlessly and seized Inako’s braid—the one tied in a single knot at the back—with brutal force.

“Please, forgive me! I beg you!”

The blade he raised glinted dully.

As she squeezed her eyes shut, it was the hair that screamed.

Somehow, her head felt strangely light. Trembling, she opened her eyes—only to see Jinbei’emon standing over her, holding a severed lock of hair dangling like the limp neck of a dead bird.

Her hand flew unconsciously behind her back—but grasped only air. Her hair was gone.

The braid, which had nearly reached the same length as her sister’s, had been cut short at the nape of her neck.

“Why… why…”

Tears blurring her vision, she looked up at him. Jinbei’emon stared back with cold, unyielding eyes.

“…Now maybe you’ll think twice. Every time, without fail—you go doing senseless things.”

“But I—I only wanted to practice fire-starting, just to pass the time, using an empty pot…”

“I haven’t the faintest idea what you’re talking about…”

Jinbei’emon pressed a hand to his forehead and twisted his mouth in utter dejection.

“For heaven’s sake… can’t you please start acting normal, just once?”

2.

That was precisely what Inako had always wished for. Jinbei’emon’s anguished expression pierced her heart far more deeply than any shouting ever could. Behind him, Yōsuke was covering his mouth, quietly laughing.

“There’s no need to worry—hair will grow back, you know. It’ll be just fine.”

“I’m sorry you had to see such an unsightly sight. If I’ve upset you in any way, I sincerely apologize.”

“My feelings haven’t changed at all, so please rest assured. Then, I’ll head back ahead of you.”

Inako stared blankly at Yōsuke’s retreating figure as he cheerfully walked away, then weakly opened her lips.

“Is it true… that Yōsuke-san wants to marry me?”

“He seems to have taken a liking to you since the moment you met. He wants to officially register the marriage right after his appointment as branch manager.”

“So soon…?”

“There’s going to be a celebration next week for Yōsuke’s promotion to branch manager. At the last minute, they’ve decided to combine it with your wedding ceremony. Since there’s no time to prepare proper bridal furnishings, it’ll be a simple affair—just registering the household registration for now.”

Jinbei’emon looked down at Inako, still sitting numbly on the earthen floor, with a puzzled expression.

“What’s with that face? You’re not actually dissatisfied with getting married, are you?”

“Am I… just a tool for business?”

“…What did you say?”

“They’re rushing through my most important day like it’s nothing but a formality?”

“Shut up!” Jinbei’emon roared.

“You don’t improve at housework or your training, you bring shame upon this family’s name, and yet you dare talk back to your father?”

Tears spilled from Inako’s eyes. “No, that’s not it—that’s not it at all…”

2.

“The fire just now—was it because of Yōsuke-san—”

“Now you’re blaming others? Dull-witted people are always quick with excuses.”

Out of the corner of her eye, she saw the maid who had witnessed the scene glaring at Inako with undisguised contempt.

“Acupuncture! Ito! Get in here!”

Yanked roughly by Jinbei’emon, Inako was dragged down the corridor and shoved into the dark storehouse at the edge of the garden. Dust swirled into the air, and she coughed involuntarily.

“You are nothing but a *Ryōfūki*,” Jinbei’emon declared solemnly.

“A useless thing, only trouble to everyone.”

The heavy door slammed shut behind her, and darkness swallowed the storehouse whole.

Jinbei’emon probably assumed, like most parents would, that the storehouse frightened Inako. But to her, this place felt as safe as being wrapped in a futon. As long as she remained inside, she wouldn’t be scolded further, wouldn’t burden anyone, and wouldn’t suffer shame.

Useless—only trouble. A fact she understood all too painfully.

Why did she keep failing? Why could no one ever understand her?

And anyway—if there truly is a Paradise after death, then why must she remain trapped in this hellish world? Her mind spun with memories: every past blunder, Jinbei’emon’s shouts, the maid’s look of utter disappointment, Yōsuke’s unsettling smile—until, finally, thinking about it all became too tiresome.

She was simply tired of trying.

“I want to die.”

That feeble whisper was undeniably Inako’s truest heart.

2.

If she remained inside, she wouldn’t be scolded further, wouldn’t burden anyone, and wouldn’t suffer shame. Useless—only trouble. A fact she understood all too painfully. Why did she keep failing? Why could no one ever understand her? And anyway—if there truly is a Paradise after death, then why must she remain trapped in this hellish world? Her mind spun with memories: every past blunder, Jinbei’emon’s shouts, the maid’s look of utter disappointment, Yōsuke’s unsettling smile—until, finally, thinking about it all became too tiresome. She was simply tired of trying. “I want to die.” That feeble whisper was undeniably Inako’s truest heart.

＊

Kihachi, carrying his luggage, arrived in front of Hyakugawa Shuzō under the searing midday sun.

A dark brown wooden fence stretched imposingly across the property, and just before it, a boy who appeared to be an apprentice had been lingering restlessly. Watching the scene from the corner of his eye, Kihachi passed through the gate and stood before the entrance.

“Excuse me, I’m from Hōrai Butsugu-ten.”

A voice replied, “Yes,” from within, and soon the door opened to reveal someone who made Kihachi blink in surprise.

At first glance, she resembled Inako—but only momentarily. He quickly realized this was another person entirely. Taller than Inako, fuller in figure, with slightly narrower eyes. Could this be Noriko, the older sister Inako had mentioned?

The woman—Noriko—flinched slightly, her eyes flickering with unease at the sight of the unfamiliar man.

“Um… I’ve brought something for Miss Inako and came to deliver it.”

“…And your name is?”

Her voice was thin, delicate—a timbre he wasn’t used to—and Kihachi’s own voice trembled in response: “S-Sakamoto Kihachi.”

Noriko studied him intently, as if assessing his worth, then swung the half-open door fully wide.

“Please come inside.”

As he followed her down the corridor, an indescribable sweet fragrance drifted from Noriko ahead of him, making Kihachi shiver involuntarily. Her long hair swayed gently, along with the red ribbon tied in it, innocent and carefree.

Soon they reached a guest room, where they sat across a table from each other. Noriko offered a faint smile.

“My name is Hyakugawa Noriko. My younger sister Inako has spoken often of being indebted to you.”

2.

“It’s not like I did much,” Kihachi replied modestly, yet his eyes were irresistibly drawn to the biscuit plate perched at the edge of the table. Noriko let out a small snort of laughter. “Go on, eat,” she said, pushing the plate toward him.

“Much obliged,” he said, unhesitatingly biting into a biscuit.

“So you came here to see Inako today?”

Kihachi choked slightly on the biscuit and hastily shook his head, then began placing a selection of clocks from his bag onto the table.

“Inago—Miss Inako mentioned wanting a wake-up clock, so I just brought some samples.”

“Hmm,” Noriko murmured, narrowing her eyes as she poked one of the clocks with her finger.

“And where is Inako now?”

“She’s in the storehouse. The girl got into trouble again last night, so she’s been locked inside. Sorry you came all this way for nothing. I’ll keep the clocks for you for now.”

“No, that’s not—” Kihachi stammered, faltering. Noriko covered her mouth, laughing.

“Thought so. You really came here because you wanted to say something to Inako, didn’t you?”

Her smile said it all—she saw right through him.

“Did Inako tell you about the fight yesterday?”

“Fight? No, I hadn’t heard. Ah, so you came to make up.”

He instinctively started to deny it, then stopped himself—afraid of being teased again—and simply fell silent.

“But it looks like you won’t be able to see her. That girl… I think she’s going to be locked in the storehouse until her wedding.”

“…Wedding?”

It was news to him, completely out of the blue. Kihachi stared at Noriko as she told him about Dr. Paikaru—and about Inako’s impending marriage.

2.

“Didn’t you?” Her smile said it all—she saw right through him. “Did Inako tell you about the fight yesterday?”  
“Fight? No, I hadn’t heard. Ah, so you came to make up.” He instinctively started to deny it, then stopped himself—afraid of being teased again—and simply fell silent. “But it looks like you won’t be able to see her. That girl… I think she’s going to be locked in the storehouse until her wedding.”  
“…Wedding?” It was news to him, completely out of the blue. Kihachi stared at Noriko as she told him about Dr. Paikaru—and about Inako’s impending marriage.

As they spoke, a faint itch crept over his body, yet strangely, he felt none of summer’s usual heat. In the corner of the room, the recently repaired *Ryōfūki* hummed softly. Had it always been this cool?

When the conversation ended, Kihachi’s voice emerged hoarse from a parched throat.  
“So the apprentice boy out front—is he keeping watch to make sure Inako doesn’t escape?”  
“That’s right. Look, you can see one in the garden too.”  

Peering through the slightly opened *shōji*, he spotted a maid idly patrolling in front of the storeroom, its heavy bolt firmly in place.  

“What should I do? Should I come again?”  

Kihachi fell silent for a moment. Then, tidying the alarm clock on the desk, he stood up smoothly.  
“I see. It seems complicated. In that case, I’ll take my leave now.”

　　　　　　　　　　＊

Whenever Inako thought back to her mother, Naeko, the memory always came with the scent of sake—intertwined with Naeko’s smile.

The image most deeply etched in her mind was of her mother with a hand towel wrapped around her topknot, wearing a simple cotton *kasuri* kimono and a *tasuki* sash, giving orders to the *kurabito*.  

Naeko had been something rare—a female *tōji*. In nearly any other brewery, such a thing would have been unthinkable.  

A *tōji* was the master brewer, the head of the entire sake operation. More than just possessing deep knowledge and refined instincts about brewing, the role included mediating among the *kurabito*, organizing labor, and overseeing every aspect of production. When Naeko’s father—the previous *tōji*, and Inako’s grandfather—retired, he recognized his daughter’s extraordinary talent and made the unprecedented decision to appoint her as successor, elevating her to the position of *tōji* despite her gender.

2.

For young Inako, who was at the age of craving affection, the brewery where Naeko worked was her favorite playground.

The *kurabito* doted on her too, letting her help carry loads during *yamadori* while singing *motosuri* songs together, and allowing her to observe each stage of sake production—teaching her the basics of brewing alongside Naeko.

“Inako,” Naeko would say, as if it were a mantra, “there are countless invisible gods dwelling inside the sake.”

She believed that when these deities took residence in the fermenting brew, fine sake would result. But if they didn’t, the batch would spoil—a condition known as *fuzō*. Even if benevolent gods first entered, if malevolent ones slipped in later, the sake would fail anyway, an affliction called *hidachi*. These evil spirits seemed vulnerable to heat, which made the pasteurization process crucial.

No one truly understood why *fuzō* or *hidachi* occurred. All humans could do was pray to the gods, beseeching them not to let harmful spirits near.

And so, every day, Inako joined Naeko in clasping her hands before the *kamidana*, praying for the safe making of the sake.

Then one year, a sudden infestation of rats broke out in the brewery.

While the family and workers panicked, Inako alone remained calm—catching rat after rat with ease. Watching her, Naeko chuckled merrily: “Well, looks like Inako’s quite the expert at rat-catching, isn’t she?”

2.

However, due to this very incident later known as the “Hyakugawa Rice Riots,” nearly all of the raw rice had to be discarded, resulting in massive losses. To make up for it, Naeko threw herself into sake brewing with even greater intensity during the winter of the following year—Meiji 33 (1900)—driving her body to the limit.

Yet no matter how hard Naeko pushed herself, there was one process she simply could not interfere with: *seigiku*, the making of koji.

This was the step where steamed rice was carried into a special room called the *kōjimuro*—a room strictly forbidden to women.

Why women were prohibited, she didn’t fully understand, but it was a common practice at virtually every other brewery as well.

“In the *kōjimuro*, the sake deity takes residence within the rice,” Naeko explained. “But the sake deity dislikes beautiful women, so if a beauty is present, He gets shy and refuses to inhabit the rice.”

Though that was the reason Naeko gave for the ban, Inako harbored a growing desire deep inside.

She wanted—just once—to see the invisible god with her own eyes.

“I’m not beautiful like Onee-san, so it should be fine,” Inako reasoned, searching for a loophole. And so, one early dawn, seizing a moment when no one else was around, she quietly slipped into the *kōjimuro*.

But the tightly sealed room was pitch dark, and she could make out nothing clearly; no sign of any godly presence appeared before her. Within less than five minutes, fear overcame her, and she fled the *kōjimuro* as if running for her life.

It had been wrong to enter—but surely, since she’d only stayed a brief moment, the god would overlook her transgression.

Carrying a tangled mix of relief and unease, the year turned, and the Twentieth Century arrived.

The subsequent brewing and pressing proceeded without incident, and just as Inako began to let her guard down—

2.

“There’s no use—this one’s spoiled.”

Tanesako, inspecting the stored sake, quietly declared.

Seeing the murmuring ripple through the *kurabito*, Inako trembled with dread.

—It’s because I entered the *kōjimuro*. I angered the god.

And misfortune continued. Soon after the sake had spoiled, Tanesako fell ill with pneumonia.

Sake brewing was grueling labor from dawn to dusk. As *tōji*, Tanesako bore a heavy burden. On top of that, her mother-in-law disapproved of Tanesako’s involvement in brewing, harshly scolding her: “For a bride, you do nothing about the household!” Tanesako had long since reached her physical and emotional limits.

“You don’t have to come visit me like this every single day.”

When Inako came to her bedside, Tanesako spoke between coughs. Her cheeks, thinned from lost weight, were deeply wrinkled; her once-lustrous hair, tied simply at the back, hung painfully over the futon.

“I’m praying properly to the gods, so it’ll be fine. Mother will surely get better.”

Tanesako smiled, then said, “Ah, let me show you something good,” and handed Inako a postcard. In the photograph, the sea stretched toward the foreground, with Mount Fuji, capped in snow, rising in the distance.

“You’ve always wanted to see Mount Fuji, haven’t you? This photo was taken from Satta Pass in Shizuoka.”

Seeing Mount Fuji in a photograph—for the first time, not in a painted scroll—stirred Inako’s heart against her will.

“How tall is Mount Fuji, exactly?”

“Much, much taller than Mount Hiei or Mount Atago.”

“Is Mount Fuji really this gray-colored mountain?”

2.

“Mother will surely get better.” Tanesako smiled, then said, “Ah, let me show you something good,” and handed Inako a postcard. In the photograph, the sea stretched toward the foreground, with Mount Fuji, capped in snow, rising in the distance. “You’ve always wanted to see Mount Fuji, haven’t you? This photo was taken from Satta Pass in Shizuoka.” Seeing Mount Fuji in a photograph—for the first time, not in a painted scroll—stirred Inako’s heart against her will. “How tall is Mount Fuji, exactly?”  
“Much, much taller than Mount Hiei or Mount Atago.”  
“Is Mount Fuji really this gray-colored mountain?”  

“The grayness is because photographs have no color. In truth, it’s a beautiful blue mountain just like in *nishiki-e* prints. …Back when we’d just gotten married, I went to Tokyo on business with Jinbei’emon-san, and we stopped by this very spot while we were there. The scenery was so breathtakingly beautiful that I bought this postcard as a souvenir.”

It was an unexpected revelation. At home, there had rarely been anything resembling conversation between the couple; all she could recall was her mother standing quietly beside the taciturn Jinbei’emon, smiling gently.

“Do you still not get along with your father, Inako?”

“…He’s scary when he gets angry, and besides—he’s cold even to you, Mother.”

“He’s the kind of man who seldom speaks his thoughts aloud. Even when he’s strict with you, Inako, it’s his own way of caring for you. So please forgive him.”

Her mother’s hand gently stroked Inako’s head. It was thin, clearly weakened by illness, but still warm.

“Mother’s illness will get better soon, right?”

“Of course it will. You’ve been praying to the gods for me, haven’t you?”

Inako pressed her tear-filled eyes against her mother’s chest.

“That trip with Jinbei’emon-san was such a joy. Is there anywhere you’d like to go, Inako?”

At Tanesako’s words, Inako sprang up. “O-Ise-san!”

“I’ll pray to the highest of gods so Mother can get well!”

Then, in a quieter tone, she added, “And… I also need to apologize to the gods for entering the *kōjimuro*.”


2.

Inako decided to confess everything to Moneko, who knew nothing of the situation. She expected to be scolded—but to her surprise, after hearing the whole story, Moneko giggled.

“Maybe the gods were flustered because Inako is so beautiful.”

“But I’m not as pretty as Onee-chan.”

Moneko pinched both of Inako’s cheeks with her hands.  
“It’s your smile. When you smile, no one’s more beautiful than you.”

“Won’t Okaa-san be angry? The sake turned bad because of me…”

“Angry? Why would I be? My proud daughter was called beautiful by the gods themselves.”

Inako didn’t know whether it was the pain in her chest at feeling how weak Moneko’s grip had become, or the warmth of those gentle words—but tears welled up in her eyes. Moneko gently wiped them away with her fingertips.

“There’s… somewhere I want to go even more than Ise-san,” Inako said, her voice trembling.

“I want to see Mount Fuji. I want to see if it’s really a mountain as grand and beautiful as in the pictures.”

“But it’s far away,” Inako added with a resigned smile. Slowly, Moneko shook her head.

“You know, from here in Kansai, you can actually see Mount Fuji.”

“What? See Mount Fuji?”

“Yes. Not too far by train—there’s a place where you can see the real Mount Fuji.”

“Really?” Inako’s face lit up instantly, leaning forward eagerly.

“Then when Okaa-san gets well, you’ll take me there, right?”

“All right. I promise.”

2.

“Pinkie swear?” Moneko raised her little finger. Inako started to extend hers too, when suddenly a maid peeked in from outside. “Excuse me—the doctor has arrived.”

“There now, Inako,” Moneko said gently. “That’s enough for today. Go back to your room.”

Inako was ushered out of the room and, feeling small and uneasy, turned back to look at Moneko.

“You know, Inako… you seem to think you’ve got nothing special about you. But your smiling face—really, it’s truly adorable. It’s like the sun itself, brightening people’s hearts.”

“Okaa-san?”

“I’m sure your smile will bring happiness to countless people.”

With that, her mother smiled—and then her face disappeared behind the sliding door as it closed shut.

The next day, Moneko’s condition took a sudden turn, and she passed away peacefully, as if falling into sleep.

At the funeral, Jinbei’emon and Noriko wore stiff, solemn expressions. Condolences, the monks’ sutras—none of it felt real. As soon as the ceremony ended, Inako found herself standing inside the brewery without knowing how she’d gotten there.

“It’s all my fault.”

She had entered the kōjimuro—the sacred fermentation chamber—where women were forbidden. She had angered the gods. The spoiled sake, her mother’s death—everything, every single thing—was punishment from the gods, divine retribution brought on by her.

The gods truly exist. They are always watching. She must never anger them again. She must remain grateful, and continue praying, so that just a fraction of their grace might be bestowed upon her.

Inako burst into sobs. The brewery, usually so full of life, was eerily quiet, and her weeping echoed sharply through the space.

Somehow, Inako had fallen asleep. Now, she woke to the oppressive heat of the earthen storehouse.

2.

Weakly lifting her head, Inako looked around with bleary eyes. Amid shelves, chests, and piles of junk, she saw a fist-sized shadow darting swiftly beside a large jar.

Fully awakened now, Inako pulled out a handkerchief and crept forward cautiously. She stood still, patiently staring at the shadowed area behind the jar. Soon, a rat darted out—and she snatched it up with her hand through the cloth.

“Five sen earned.”

Plague had long raged across Japan as a dreaded epidemic. Just last year, when cases surfaced in Fushimi Town and caused an uproar, a government program was launched to buy one rat for five sen, since rats were known carriers of the disease.

Inako, having been repeatedly locked inside storehouses, had grown accustomed to rats and knew exactly how to catch them. Last year, hoping to help her family’s finances, she had captured them in large numbers—but suspicion arose that she might be breeding them, so the authorities refused to buy, turning her into the neighborhood’s laughingstock. In the end, she was even beaten with a cane by Jinbei’emon.

As she wondered whether the rat-buying program was still running, her stomach let out a loud growl.

“Ugh… I’m so hungry…”

The moment she muttered this, a small, round light appeared on the floor, and Inako leapt up, still clutching the rat.

The circular light pulsed and writhed across the floor. When Inako timidly tapped it with her free hand, the light raced up her arm, surged through her body, and her vision flared with blinding brilliance.

Blinking against the glare, she saw Sakamoto Kihachi peering in through the latticed window, holding a glowing tube, utterly stunned.

“You… You weren’t planning to *eat* that, were you?”

Inako, flustered, hastily dropped the rat at the sight of Kihachi’s twisted, horrified expression.

---

2.

The moment she muttered this, a small, round light appeared on the floor, and Inako leapt up, still clutching the rat. The circular light pulsed and writhed across the floor. When Inako timidly tapped it with her free hand, the light raced up her arm, surged through her body, and her vision flared with blinding brilliance. Blinking against the glare, she saw Sakamoto Kihachi peering in through the latticed window, holding a glowing tube, utterly stunned. “You… You weren’t planning to *eat* that, were you?” Inako, flustered, hastily dropped the rat at the sight of Kihachi’s twisted, horrified expression.

“No way! I’d never eat a rat!”

She approached the lattice window, indignant, then pointed at the tube. “What *is* that thing you’ve been shining all along?”

“This is a flashlight. In Japanese, it’s called a *denchūdentō*.”

Kihachi fiddled with the knob, and the bulb at the end of the tube flickered.

“This time, it’s not spring-powered. It’s real, genuine electricity.”

At those words, Inako remembered yesterday’s argument and grew awkward, turning her eyes away from Kihachi.

Kihachi, perhaps thinking the same thing, stiffened. “Well… uh, that…”

“You were worried about that alarm clock yesterday, right? So today, I brought a sample. Then Sister Inago told me where you were, so I came over the back wall.”

Only then, as he finished speaking, did Kihachi finally notice. “Wait—you… your hair…” He gasped.

Inako gave a weak smile and ran her fingers through the shortened ends.

“Pretty bad, huh? I thought I could finally catch up to my sister now, but instead… I’ve fallen even further behind.”

“But you’re getting married soon, right? Why cut such precious hair?”

“Oh, so you heard about the wedding too,” said Inako, and when she began explaining yesterday’s misstep, Kihachi asked seriously, “So… does that mean Inago is going to marry that Dr. Paikaru?”

“I’m someone whose only strength is believing in others, so I have no right to be selfish. If marrying him would help our family… then I will…”

Her lips trembled as she tried to continue. She knew full well she wasn’t in a position to choose. But.

2.

“I’ve been trying, in my own way, to grow up fast—swallowing down things I wanted to say, always reflecting, carrying every grudge and complaint straight to God. …But no matter what, nothing ever works out.”

Household duties, practice—all half-done. In the end, she’d only caused endless trouble, disappointing everyone around her. Maybe, just by breathing, she was dragging the world down.

“…Really, what’s the point of me even being born?”

Suddenly, Kihachi opened the cap of his flashlight and pulled out a cylindrical object from inside.

“This is a dry cell battery. Invented twenty years ago by a man named Yai—the first in the world. But apparently, it didn’t sell at all at first. Back then, there just weren’t enough machines in the world that could use dry batteries.”

Puzzled, Inako listened to Kihachi, unsure where this was going.

“Back then, telephones used liquid batteries. But during the Sino-Japanese War, those liquid batteries froze in Manchuria’s cold. So they started using dry batteries instead. That story made the newspapers, and for the first time, people realized how powerful dry batteries could be.”

Kihachi paused. “It’s the same with you,” he said, then continued.

“There’s definitely a reason you were born, Inago. It’s just that neither the world nor you yourself have realized it yet.”

Inako lowered her head and bit her lip. If she didn’t, everything inside her might collapse.

Kihachi’s words were kind. But that very direct kindness struck her heart mercilessly.

“So, Inago—”

“What do *you* know about it, Sakamoto-san!”  

2.

For a moment, the storehouse fell silent. Outside, as if remembering something, the cicadas began their shrill song once more.

“My head’s not right—I’m sure of it. I’ve got some unnamed illness eating away at my mind. But since no one else can see it, I have to live just like everybody else. I’d actually be relieved if a doctor would just tell me outright I’ve got a sickness in my head… Then I could accept it. Then I’d have an excuse.”

She had tried to endure—but failed. Large drops fell from Inako’s eyes, sliding down one by one.

“Believing is my only strength. Yet I can’t even believe in myself.”

“Then you’ll stay here forever? If you shut yourself in this dark place, you’ll never find any meaning in living.”

“Then where *should* I be—?”

And as she asked herself that, she suddenly realized—there was one place, and only one, truly suited for her.

How had she never noticed before? It was so simple.

“Well then,”

she said, lifting her swollen face, managing only a faint smile with her lips.

“Will you die with me, and take me to Paradise?”

Kihachi’s eyes widened. He understood—she was dead serious.

“There, at least, I won’t trouble anyone. I think we could be happy.”

“Paradise…”

Kihachi turned his face away. Without another word, he simply walked off. Once his figure vanished from sight, Inako slumped weakly against the wall.

He must think I’m mad, saying such things, Kihachi probably thought, stunned.

And that was fine. Her thoughts were never meant to be understood by anyone.

2.

Leaning dazedly against the wall, listening to the distant clamor from outside and the chirping of cicadas, Inako suddenly heard a deafening toll of a temple bell that drowned out all other sounds.

“What—fire?”

The urgent clanging carried the panic of her household—the sound of people scrambling in confusion. Just as Inako began to push herself up, the storehouse door burst open, and Kihachi stepped inside.

“Well then, let’s go.”

Backlit by the outdoor light, Kihachi reached out his hand to her.

“I’m takin’ you to Paradise right now.”

“…To where?”

“To Paradise. Ain’t that what you wanted to see?”

Inako gaped, unable to comprehend what he was saying.

“What on earth are you talking—”

“Hurry. Let’s go before they notice.”

Grabbing her arm, he pulled her along without waiting for an answer, dragging her out of the storehouse.

Once outside, they ducked beside the building to survey the surroundings. The bell still rang without pause, and the maid who had been watching the engawa was now running through the house with a look of terror.

“W-where’s the fire even happening?”

“Ah, that bell? That’s my alarm clock I just set up under the floorboards.”

“An alarm clock? Isn’t it way too loud? You’ll bother the neighbors!”

“Well, there *is* ‘Track Eleven: Thunder Summoner’ in the *Denki Mokuroku*—that one jolts you awake with pure current—”

“Scary! Don’t say any more!”

2.

An answer, dragging her out of the storehouse. Once outside, they ducked beside the building to survey the surroundings. The bell still rang without pause, and the maid who had been watching the engawa was now running through the house with a look of terror. “W-where’s the fire even happening?”  
“Ah, that bell? That’s my alarm clock I just set up under the floorboards.”  
“An alarm clock? Isn’t it way too loud? You’ll bother the neighbors!”  
“Well, there *is* ‘Track Eleven: Thunder Summoner’ in the *Denki Mokuroku*—that one jolts you awake with pure current—”  
“Scary! Don’t say any more!”

They slipped out through the back door, careful not to be seen by anyone in the house, then peeked onto the main street. Just then, firefighters arrived in a rush, hastily assembling a hand-pump engine in front of the house. Inako began feeling dizzy at the chaos unfolding around her, but Kihachi grabbed her again, trying to pull her away.

“Inako-kun!”  

A sharp voice rang out as Roku emerged from the crowd of onlookers.

Today he wasn’t wearing his Salvation Army uniform; instead, he wore Western clothes—a black shirt and trousers. Roku’s eyes locked onto Kihachi gripping Inako’s arm. Something snapped in his expression—he instantly flared with anger.

“You! What do you think you’re doing?!”

“Damn it—run!”

They bolted, but Roku charged after them like a locomotive, rapidly closing the gap.

Gasping for breath, they strained their legs to run faster, but the wooden clogs hampered their pace.

Just as Roku closed in behind them, reaching out toward Kihachi—

*Ding, ding.* A bell chimed.

From the side, a tram surged forward, blotting Roku from view.

Unaware, the two had already crossed the tracks of the Kyoto Electric Railway. Like scooping goldfish, Roku was caught mid-stride by the tram’s emergency net. The net sagged under his weight—unable to hold him—and his backside scraped across the ground through the mesh as he was dragged along. “It burns! It burns!” he cried out, carried off by the moving vehicle.

Inako and Kihachi watched, hearts pounding, until the tram finally came to a stop. Slowly, Roku crawled out from beneath the net.

2.

*Ding, ding.* A bell chimed. From the side, a tram surged forward, blotting Roku from view. Unaware, the two had already crossed the tracks of the Kyoto Electric Railway. Like scooping goldfish, Roku was caught mid-stride by the tram’s emergency net. The net sagged under his weight—unable to hold him—and his backside scraped across the ground through the mesh as he was dragged along. “It burns! It burns!” he cried out, carried off by the moving vehicle. Inako and Kihachi watched, hearts pounding, until the tram finally came to a stop. Slowly, Roku crawled out from beneath the net.

As passersby on the street halted in confusion, the two scrambled into a nearby rickshaw. Kihachi urged the puller: “Just get us away from here. You’d better move faster than that tram!”

Perhaps stung by the insult to his professional pride, the rickshaw man grunted, “Understood,” then set off with fierce determination.

“Roku-kun, wait up!”

But the rickshaw sped on violently, and Roku’s pained figure—clutching his rear—vanished swiftly into the distance.

